District of Columbia statutes.
9-908

Operation of foreign trade zone.

The Authority may establish, operate, and maintain a foreign trade zone and otherwise expedite and encourage foreign commerce.

Dec. 3, 1985, D.C. Law 6-67, § 9, 32 DCR 6093

History

1981 Ed., § 7-1258.

Prior Codifications